da: Komponent-monteringstype: Chassismontering; DIN-skinne-montering; Panelmontering; Plug-in; Prespasset; Snap-in; Sokkelmontering; Overflademontering (SMD/SMT); Gennemgående hul (THT); Andet
de: Komponenten-Montagestil: Gehäusemontage; DIN-Schienenmontage; Schalttafelmontage; Plug-in; Einpressmontage; Schnappbefestigung; Sockelmontage; Oberflächenmontage (SMD/SMT); Durchsteckmontage (THT); Sonstiges
nl: Component montagestijl: Chassismontage; DIN-railmontage; Paneelmontage; Insteken; Perspassing; Snap-in; Socketmontage; Oppervlaktemontage (SMD/SMT); Doorsteek (THT); Andere
it: Stile di montaggio del componente: Montaggio su telaio; Montaggio su guida DIN; Montaggio su pannello; Plug-in; A pressione; A scatto; Montaggio su zoccolo; Montaggio superficiale (SMD/SMT); A foro passante (THT); Altro
lt-LT: Komponento montavimo stilius: Korpuso montavimas; DIN bėgelio montavimas; Panelės montavimas; Įkišamas; Presuojamas; Įspaudžiamas; Lizdo montavimas; Paviršinis montavimas (SMD/SMT); Per kiaurymę (THT); Kita
th: สไตล์การติดตั้งส่วนประกอบ: ติดตั้งบนแชสซี; ติดตั้งบนราง DIN; ติดตั้งบนแผง; ปลั๊กอิน; แบบกดให้แน่น; แบบล็อกเข้าที่; ติดตั้งบนซ็อกเก็ต; ติดตั้งแบบพื้นผิว (SMD/SMT); แบบผ่านรู (THT); อื่นๆ
sv: Komponentmonteringsstil: Chassimonterad; DIN-skenmonterad; Panelmonterad; Plug-in; Presspassning; Snap-in; Sockelmonterad; Ytmonterad (SMD/SMT); Genomgående hål (THT); Övrigt
bg-BG: Стил на монтиране на компонент: Монтаж към шаси; Монтаж на DIN шина; Панелен монтаж; Плъгин; С притискане; Със защракване; Монтаж в гнездо; Повърхностен монтаж (SMD/SMT); През отвор (THT); Други
zh-CN: 组件安装样式: 机箱安装; DIN 导轨安装; 面板安装; 插入式; 压配合; 卡入式; 插座安装; 表面贴装 (SMD/SMT); 通孔 (THT); 其他
es: Estilo de montaje del componente: Montaje en chasis; Montaje en riel DIN; Montaje en panel; Enchufe; Ajuste a presión; De encaje; Montaje en zócalo; Montaje superficial (SMD/SMT); De inserción (THT); Otros
fr: Style de montage du composant: Montage sur châssis; Montage sur rail DIN; Montage sur panneau; Plug-in; Montage par pression; Encliquetable; Montage sur support; Montage en surface (CMS/SMT); Traversant (THT); Autre
ja: コンポーネント取り付けスタイル: シャーシマウント; DINレールマウント; パネルマウント; プラグイン; プレスフィット; スナップイン; ソケットマウント; 表面実装（SMD/SMT）; スルーホール（THT）; その他
zh-TW: 元件安裝樣式: 機殼安裝; DIN 導軌安裝; 面板安裝; 插件; 壓接式; 卡入式; 插座安裝; 表面黏著 (SMD/SMT); 插入式 (THT); 其他
tr: Bileşen montaj stili: Şasi montajı; DIN ray montajı; Panel montajı; Eklenti; Sıkıştırmalı; Geçmeli; Soket montajı; Yüzey montajı (SMD/SMT); Delikli montaj (THT); Diğer
hr-HR: Stil montiranja komponente: Montaža na kućište; Montaža na DIN šinu; Montaža na ploču; Utikač; Prešano uklapanje; Uskočno; Montaža u utičnicu; Površinska montaža (SMD/SMT); Kroz rupu (THT); Ostalo
nb: Komponent monteringsstil: Chassismontert; DIN-skinnemontert; Panelmontert; Plug-in; Presspassning; Klikk-inn; Sokkelmontert; Overflatemontering (SMD/SMT); Gjennomhullsmontering (THT); Annet
ro-RO: Stil montare componentă: Montare pe șasiu; Montare pe șină DIN; Montare pe panou; Cu ștecher; Montare prin presare; Montare prin fixare rapidă; Montare în soclu; Montare pe suprafață (SMD/SMT); Montare prin găuri (THT); Altele
pt-PT: Estilo de montagem do componente: Montagem em chassis; Montagem em calha DIN; Montagem em painel; Plug-in; Press-fit; Encaixe; Montagem em socket; Montagem superficial (SMD/SMT); Montagem through-hole (THT); Outro
en: Component mounting style: Chassis mount; DIN rail mount; Panel mount; Plug-in; Press-fit; Snap-in; Socket mount; Surface-mount (SMD/SMT); Through-hole (THT); Other
pl: Sposób montażu komponentu: Montaż w obudowie; Montaż na szynie DIN; Montaż panelowy; Plug-in; Wciskany; Zatrzaskowy; Montaż w podstawce; Montaż powierzchniowy (SMD/SMT); Przewlekany (THT); Inne
hu: Komponensrögzítési stílus: Vázra szerelhető; DIN sínre szerelhető; Panelre szerelhető; Csatlakoztatható; Sajtolt illesztés; Bepattintható; Foglalatba helyezhető; Felületre szerelhető (SMD/SMT); Furatszerelt (THT); Egyéb
ko: 컴포넌트 장착 스타일: 섀시 마운트; DIN 레일 마운트; 패널 마운트; 플러그인; 압입식; 스냅인; 소켓 마운트; 표면 실장 (SMD/SMT); 관통 홀 (THT); 기타
cs: Styl montáže součástek: Montáž na šasi; Montáž na DIN lištu; Panelová montáž; Plug-in; Lisovaný spoj; Zacvakávací; Montáž do patice; Povrchová montáž (SMD/SMT); Vývodová montáž (THT); Jiné
sk-SK: Štýl montáže súčiastky: Montáž na šasi; Montáž na DIN lištu; Panelová montáž; Pripojený; Lisovaný; Zacvakávací; Montáž do pätice; Povrchová montáž (SMD/SMT); Cez otvor (THT); Iné
pt-BR: Estilo de montagem do componente: Montagem em chassi; Montagem em trilho DIN; Montagem em painel; Plugar; Pressão; Encaixe; Montagem em soquete; Montagem superficial (SMD/SMT); Through-hole (THT); Outro
el: Στυλ στήριξης εξαρτήματος: Τοποθέτηση σε σασί; Τοποθέτηση σε ράγα DIN; Τοποθέτηση σε πίνακα; Plug-in; Με πίεση; Με κούμπωμα; Τοποθέτηση σε υποδοχή; Επιφανειακή τοποθέτηση (SMD/SMT); Διαμπερής οπή (THT); Άλλο
fi: Komponentin kiinnitystyyli: Runkokiinnitys; DIN-kiskokiinnitys; Paneelikiinnitys; Liitännäinen; Puristuskiinnitys; Napsautuskiinnitys; Kantakiinnitys; Pinta-asennus (SMD/SMT); Läpireikäasennus (THT); Muu
vi: Kiểu lắp linh kiện: Lắp khung gầm; Lắp ray DIN; Lắp bảng điều khiển; Cắm vào; Ép khít; Lắp nhanh; Lắp ổ cắm; Gắn bề mặt (SMD/SMT); Xuyên lỗ (THT); Khác
sl-SI: Slog montaže komponente: Montaža na šasijo; Montaža na letev DIN; Montaža na ploščo; Vtična; Tlačno prileganje; Zaskočni; Montaža v podnožje; Površinska montaža (SMD/SMT); Skozi luknjo (THT); Drugo
ru: Тип монтажа компонента: Монтаж на шасси; Монтаж на DIN-рейку; Панельный монтаж; Вставной; Запрессовка; Защелкивающийся; Монтаж в гнездо; Поверхностный монтаж (SMD/SMT); Сквозной монтаж (THT); Другой